Massachusetts, session 194th, H5610.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 69 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsections (a) and (b) and inserting in place 
thereof the following 2 subsections:- 
(a) There shall be a permanent commission on the status of grandparents raising 
grandchildren that shall consist of 21 members: 3 members to be appointed by the secretary of 
aging and independence, 1 of whom shall be from the secretary’s office in the executive office of 
aging and independence; 3 members to be appointed by the commissioner of children and 
families, 1 of whom who shall be from the department of children and families and 2 of whom 
shall be grandparents or kinship caregivers with current or past experience raising minor 
children; 1 member to be appointed by the commissioner of transitional assistance; 2 members to 
be appointed by the governor; 2 members to be appointed by the speaker of the house of 
representatives, 1 of whom shall be a member of the house of representatives; 1 member to be 
appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; 2 members to be appointed by 

of 3 14 the president of the senate, 1 of whom shall be a member of the senate; 1 member to be 
appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 1 member to be appointed by the attorney 
general; 1 member to be appointed by the chief justice of the probate and family court who shall 
have a demonstrated commitment to the rearing of grandchildren by grandparents; 1 member to 
be appointed by the chief justice of the juvenile court who shall have a demonstrated 
commitment to the rearing of grandchildren by grandparents; and 3 members who shall be 
nominated for appointment by the officers of the commission and appointed by a majority vote 
of the commissioners present and voting and who shall be grandparents or kinship caregivers 
with current or past experience raising minor children. Members of the commission shall be 
residents of the commonwealth who have demonstrated a commitment to the rearing of 
grandchildren by grandparents. 
(b) Members shall serve terms of 4 years and until their successors are appointed. 
Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled by the original appointing 
authority for the balance of the unexpired term. All appointments shall be made in consultation 
with the commission. Nominations for members shall be solicited by the appointing authorities 
between August 1st and September 16th of each year through an open application process. 
SECTION 2. Said section 69 of said chapter 3 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by striking out subsection (e) and inserting in place thereof the following 
subsection:- 
(e) The commission shall be a resource to the commonwealth on issues affecting 
grandparents raising grandchildren. In furtherance of that responsibility, the commission shall: 
(i) foster unity among grandparents raising grandchildren communities and organizations by 

of 3 36 promoting cooperation and sharing of information and encouraging collaboration and joint 
activities; (ii) serve as a liaison between government and private interest groups with regard to 
matters of unique interest and concern to grandparents raising grandchildren in the 
commonwealth; (iii) assess programs, regulations and practices affecting grandparents raising 
grandchildren throughout all agencies and departments; (iv) advocate for changes to said 
programs, regulations and practices, as the commission deems necessary and appropriate; (v) 
advise executive and legislative bodies of the potential effect of proposed legislation on 
grandparents raising grandchildren, as the commission deems necessary and appropriate; (vi) 
advocate for changes to said proposed legislation that the commission deems necessary and 
appropriate; (vii) investigate the merits of the establishment of a state agency dedicated to 
grandparents issues and determine how such agency would be set up; and (viii) identify issues 
that are faced by relatives, other than parents, who are raising children.